test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dóttir
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dóttur
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dóttur
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dóttur
    dóttir+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: døtur
    dóttir+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: døtrum
    dóttir+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: døtra
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dóttirin
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dóttrina
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: [dótturini, dóttrini]
    dóttir+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dótturinnar
    dóttir+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: døturnar
    dóttir+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: døtrunum
    dóttir+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: døtranna
